src/morphology/stemparts/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_TUMMAHKO

[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VALKAISTU

[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_HÄPÄISTY

[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_HÖLÖ

[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_TOOPE

[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_BEIGE
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KOHELO

[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÖPERÖ


[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AUTIO

[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_RIIVIÖ

[CMP=POS]:0 A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
[CMP=POS]:0 A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_KOLKKO

[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
[CMP=POS]:ko    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_VIRKKU

[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:u        A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:u        A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ku        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:u        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:u        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_SÄIKKY

[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:y        A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:y        A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN ;
[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ky        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:y        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:y        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_KÖKKÖ

[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN ;
[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:kö        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_SUIPPO

[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:o        A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:o        A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:o        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:o        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_IKÄLOPPU

[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:u        A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:u        A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:pu        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:u        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:u        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_LÖRPPÖ

[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN ;
[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:pö        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_VELTTO

[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:o        A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:o        A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:o        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:o        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_VIMMATTU

[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:u        A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:u        A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:u        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:u        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_YLENNETTY

[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:y        A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:y        A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ty        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:y        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:y        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_KYYTTÖ




[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN ;
[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:tö       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_LAKO




[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:o        A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:’o       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:o        A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:’o       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:ko       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:o        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:o        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_KELPO




[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:vo       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:vo       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:po        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:vo       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:vo       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_MIETO




[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:do       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:do       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:to        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:do       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:do       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_VIIPALOITU




[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:du       A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:du       A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
[CMP=POS]:tu        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:du       A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:du       A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;
